South Dakota, session 2026, HB1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-39-3 be AMENDED:
32-39-3. For the purposes of this chapter, a dealer is any person whose sales of
the manufacturer's equipment is equal to or exceeds thirty percent of the dealer's gross
agricultural equipment sales during the preceding calendar year.

26.980.11 2 1263
An Act to eliminate an exclusion from the definition of an agricultural equipment dealer.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1263
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1263 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1263 ENROLLED